Utah statutes.
6-1-18.   Death or neglect of assignee.
If an assignee dies before the closing of his trust, or shall fail or neglect
for the period of 20 days after making of any assignment to file an inventory
and valuation and give bond as required in this title, the district court or
any judge thereof of the county where such assignment may be recorded, on the
application of any person interested, shall appoint some person to execute the
trust, who shall on giving bond have all the powers of the assignee first
appointed and be subject to all the duties hereby imposed. If it is shown to
the court at any time that an assignee is guilty of wasting or misapplying the
trust fund, he may be removed, and a successor appointed in the same manner.
